Maryland, session 2026, HB1597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–209.
(A) THERE IS AN UNREGULATED SPACE IN HOSPITAL OPERATING SUITES
PILOT PROJECT.
(B) THE PILOT PROJECT SHALL BE ADMINISTERED BY THE COMMISSION.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED TO ALLOW UP TO FIVE
HOSPITALS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT PROJECT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1597*

HOUSE BILL 1597
(2) A HOSPITAL PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROJECT MAY BE
SUBJECT TO AN ALTERNATE METHOD OF RATE DETERMINATION, INCLUDING AN
EXEMPTION FROM RATES THAT ALLOWS UNREGULATED OPERATING ROOM SPACE
TO BE PHYSICALLY LOCATED WITHIN A REGULATED FACILITY.
(3) A HOSPITAL PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROJECT IS
AUTHORIZED TO MAKE AVAILABLE UNREGULATED OPERATING ROOM SPACE TO ALL
PATIENTS AND ALL PAYERS, WITH NO DUPLICATION OF SERVICES IN REGULATED
OPERATING ROOM SPACE.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP CRITERIA AND STANDARDS FOR
HOSPITALS PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROJECT, INCLUDING THAT:
(1) A PARTICIPATING HOSPITAL SHALL OFFER CHARITY CARE
CONSISTENT WITH REGULATED HOSPITAL SERVICES;
(2) THE BILLED CHARGE FOR A SERVICE MAY NOT BE HIGHER THAN
THE PARTICIPATING HOSPITAL’S BILLED CHARGE FOR A SIMILAR SERVICE;
(3) THE COST TO THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM AND
MEDICARE SHALL BE LOWER THAN A SIMILAR REGULATED HOSPITAL SERVICE; AND
(4) A PARTICIPATING HOSPITAL SHALL INCREASE CONSUMER
AWARENESS AND EDUCATION ABOUT REGULATED AND NONREGULATED SERVICES,
INCLUDING THE POTENTIAL FOR ADDITIONAL BILLED CHARGES FROM PHYSICIANS.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION
SHALL REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, TO THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH
COMMITTEE ON:
(I) 1. THE TYPES OF PROCEDURES THAT HAVE OCCURRED
IN A PARTICIPATING HOSPITAL’S UNREGULATED OPERATING ROOM SPACE; AND
2. WHETHER THE OUTCOME OF THOSE PROCEDURES
INDICATES THAT THEY WERE APPROPRIATELY PERFORMED IN UNREGULATED
OPERATING ROOM SPACE;
(II) THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH A HOSPITAL’S
PARTICIPATION IN THE PILOT PROJECT; AND

HOUSE BILL 1597 3
(III) THE EFFECTS OF THE PILOT PROJECT ON THE STATE’S
ACHIEVING HEALTHCARE EFFICIENCY THROUGH ACCOUNTABLE DESIGN
(AHEAD) MODEL.
(2) EACH AMBULATORY SURGICAL CENTER ASSOCIATED WITH A
PARTICIPATING HOSPITAL AND FREESTANDING SURGICAL CENTER IN A
PARTICIPATING HOSPITAL’S AREA SHALL PROVIDE THE COMMISSION WITH
INFORMATION DETERMINED NECESSARY BY THE COMMISSION TO COMPLETE THE
REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.